Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Upper Colorado River Basin Compact
§ 41-12-402.
When binding; notice of ratification.

Said compact shall not be binding or obligatory upon any of the high contracting parties thereto unless and until the same shall have been ratified by the legislature of each of the said states and approved by the congress of the United States. The governor of Wyoming shall give notice of the ratification and approval of said compact by the thirtieth Wyoming legislature to the governors of the states of Arizona, Colorado, New Mexico and Utah, and to the president of the United States.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 6, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-508.

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 3.